Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-451
License; disciplinary actions; notice.

(1) If the department determines to deny, refuse renewal of, or take disciplinary action against a license, the department shall send to the applicant or licensee, by certified mail to the last address shown on the records of the department, a notice setting forth the determination, the particular reasons for the determination, including a specific description of the nature of the violation and the statute, rule, or regulation violated, and the type of disciplinary action which is pending. The denial, refusal to renew, or disciplinary action shall become final fifteen days after the mailing of the notice unless the applicant or licensee, within such fifteen-day period, makes a written request for an informal conference or a hearing pursuant to section 71-452.

(2) A copy of the notice in subsection (1) of this section shall also be mailed to the holder of the license if the holder of such license is not actually involved in the daily operation of the facility or service. If the holder of the license is a corporation, a copy of the notice shall be sent to the corporation's registered agent.

Laws 2000, LB 819, § 51.